Maryland, session 2025, HB1498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
The Charter of Baltimore City
Article V – Comptroller
§ 16.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AUDIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(B) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY BIENNIAL AUDIT REQUIRED IN § 11 OF THIS
ARTICLE, WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER ANY WATER AND SEWER SERVICE CHARGE
INCREASE BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS, THE CITY AUDITOR SHALL
CONDUCT AN AUDIT OF THE DEPARTMENT’S WATER SERVICES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1498*

HOUSE BILL 1498
(2) THE AUDIT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) INFORMATION ON WATER USAGE;
(II) INFORMATION ON WATER LEAKAGE AND BROKEN PIPES;
AND
(III) JUSTIFICATION FOR THE SERVICE CHARGE INCREASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.